GRAMMARS/GERMAN/FST1/src/header.lexc
! -------------------------------------------------------------------
! UNSEPARABLE VERB PREFIXES (may occur truncated)
LEXICON PUnsep		
  +Unsep@U.cpd.no@	Trunc0 ;	! be- und entladen
					! das Be- und Entladen

! -------------------------------------------------------------------
! SEPARABLE VERB PREFIXES
! (A) simple ("unproductive") prefixes, i.e.
!     i.e. verb forms must be lexicalised with their prefixes
! LX: 	ein+Pref  PSep ;
!	[old]eis+Pref	PSep ;
! ==>	eis		:: eis+Pref+Sep^OldLem^OldSrf
!	eis-		:: eis+Pref+Sep+Cpd^OldLem^OldSrf
!	ein		:: ein+Pref+Sep
!	ein-		:: ein+Pref+Cpd

LEXICON PSep		
  +Sep:0		inv ;		! er kommt an
  +Sep@U.cpd.no@	Trunc0 ;	! an- und abfahren
					! An- und Abreise

! -------------------------------------------------------------------
! SEPARABLE VERB PREFIXES
! (B) prefixes which combine with "any" verb
! (Note: other readings must be lexicxalised separately !)
! LX: 	hinaus+Pref    VSep1 ;
!	hinaus+Adv     XX ;
!
! ==>	hinaus		:: hinaus+Pref+Sep
!	hinaus-		:: hinaus+Pref+Sep+Cpd
!	hinausstellen	:: hinaus+Pref^=stellen...
!	hinausgestellt	:: hinaus+Pref^=stellen+Verb+PPast...
!	Hinausstellung	:: hinaus+Pref^=Stellung+Noun...
!
! (C) "old" prefixes which correspond to adverbs
!     (always separeted in new spelling!)
! LX: aufeinander+Adv  VSepAdv ;
! ==>   aufeinander		:: aufeinander+Adv
!	aufeinander-		:: aufeinander+Adv+Cpd
!	aufeinanderstellt	:: aufeinander+Adv^=stellen...^Old
!	aufeinandergestellt	:: aufeinander+Adv^=stellen+Verb+PPast...^Old
!				:: aufeinander+Adv^#stellen+Verb+PPast^]+Adj...
!	Aufeinanderstellung	:: aufeinander+Adv^#Stellung+Noun...
!				:: aufeinander+Adv^=Stellung+Noun...^Old
!
! (D) multiple prefix
! LX:	wieder+Adv  VSep2 ;
! ==>   wieder			:: wieder+Adv
!	wieder-			:: wieder+Adv+Cpd
!	wiederkommen		:: wieder+Adv^=kommen+Verb...^Old
!	wiederhereinkommen	:: wieder+Adv^=herein+Pref^=kommen+Verb...^Old
! -------------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON VSep0
 [P][Z]			VerbStems ;	! rück-[stellen]

LEXICON VSep1		
 @U.vpref.1@		PSep ;
 [P][Z]			VerbStems ;

LEXICON VSep2
 @U.vpref.1@		inv ;		! wieder+Adv	
 @U.vpref.1@		Trunc ;		! wieder+Adv+Cpd
 @U.vpref.2@[old][P][Z]	VerbPrefix1 ;	! wiederhereinkommen
 @U.vpref.2@[P][Z]	VerbStems ;	! wiederkommen

LEXICON VSepAdv
 @U.vpref.1@		inv ;		! aufeinander+Adv	
 @U.vpref.1@		Trunc ;		! aufeinander+Adv+Cpd
! [old][P][Z]		VerbStems ;
 [P][Z]			VerbStems ;


LEXICON Compound	< "@D.cpd.no@" "@P.cpd.yes@" "^#" >	Root1 ;
LEXICON Hyphen		< "@D.cpd.no@" "@P.cpd.dsh@" "^-" >	Root1 ;

LEXICON Trunc0		+Cpd:-		Fin ;

LEXICON Trunc		Trunc0 ; Compound ; Hyphen ;
LEXICON Trunc-		Trunc0 ; Hyphen ;
